inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_am.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: zaaga'amaan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: zaaga'aman
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: zaaga'amaang
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: zaaga'amang
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: zaaga'ameg
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: zaaga'ang
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: zaaga'amowaan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: zaaga'aminid
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: zaaga'aminid
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: zaaga'aming
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: zaaga'anziwaan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: zaaga'anziwan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: zaaga'anziwaang
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: zaaga'anziwang
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: zaaga'anziweg
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: zaaga'anzig
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: zaaga'anzigwaa
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: zaaga'anzinig
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: zaaga'anzinig
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: zaaga'anzing
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: zaaga'amaambaan	
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: zaaga'amamban	
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: zaaga'amaangiban	
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: zaaga'amangiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: zaaga'amegiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'angiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: zaaga'amowaapan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: zaaga'aminipan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: zaaga'aminipan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: zaaga'amingiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: zaaga'anziwaambaan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: zaaga'anziwamban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: zaaga'anziwaangiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: zaaga'anziwangiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: zaaga'anziwegiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'anzigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: zaaga'anzigwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: zaaga'anzinigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: zaaga'anzinigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: zaaga'anzingiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: zaaga'amowaanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: zaaga'amowanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: zaaga'amowaangen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: zaaga'amowangen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: zaaga'amowegwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: zaaga'amogwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: zaaga'amowaagwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: zaaga'aminigwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: zaaga'aminigwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: zaaga'amowiingen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: zaaga'anziiwaanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: zaaga'anziiwanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: zaaga'anziiwaangen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: zaaga'anziiwangen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: zaaga'anziiwegwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: zaaga'anziigwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: zaaga'anziiwaagwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: zaaga'anziinigwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: zaaga'anziinigwen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: zaaga'anziiwiingen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg: zaaga'amowaambaanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg: zaaga'amowambanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl: zaaga'amowaangibanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl: zaaga'amowangibanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl: zaaga'amowegibanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'amogobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: zaaga'amowaagobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: zaaga'aminigobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: zaaga'aminigobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X: zaaga'amowiingibanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg: zaaga'amowaambaanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg: zaaga'amowambanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl: zaaga'amowaangibanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl: zaaga'amowangibanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl: zaaga'amowegibanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'amogobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: zaaga'amowaagobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: zaaga'aminigobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: zaaga'aminigobanen
     zaaga'am+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X: zaaga'amowiingibanen
